Florida, session 2026, SB708.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 24 25 Section 1.âPresent paragraphs (e), (f), and (g) of 26 subsection (3) of section 908.1031, Florida Statutes, are 27 redesignated as paragraphs (f), (g), and (h), respectively, and 28 a new paragraph (e) is added to that subsection, to read: 29 908.1031âState Board of Immigration Enforcement; creation; 30 purpose and duties.â 31 (3)âThe board is the chief immigration enforcement officer 32 of the state and shall: 33 (e)âCreate and administer the State Immigration Enforcement 34 Action Database established in s. 908.1034. 35 Section 2.âSection 908.1034, Florida Statutes, is created 36 to read: 37 908.1034âState Immigration Enforcement Action Database.â 38 (1)âThe State Board of Immigration Enforcement is 39 responsible for creating and administering a database of 40 immigration enforcement actions performed by any state law 41 enforcement agency or entity contracting for private 42 correctional services in this state. The database must be 43 accessible through a publicly available website and be 44 searchable by agency and name. 45 (2)âA law enforcement agency or an entity contracting for 46 private correctional services in this state shall submit all of 47 the following information to the board within 48 hours after 48 detaining or arresting a person for an immigration-related 49 reason, accepting custody of a person detained for an 50 immigration-related reason, or otherwise participating in an 51 immigration enforcement action: 52 (a)âThe name and birthdate of any person whom the agency: 53 1.âTransfers to federal immigration authorities on a 54 detainer. 55 2.âArrests or detains for an immigration-related reason. 56 3.âMaintains custody of pending immigration proceedings or 57 deportation. 58 4.âKnows to have been detained by federal authorities 59 pursuant to an immigration enforcement action in which the 60 agency cooperated. 61 (b)âThe following additional information related to a 62 person who meets the conditions specified in paragraph (a): 63 1.âThe date and location of arrest or detention of the 64 person. 65 2.âWhether such person is currently housed in the custody 66 of a law enforcement agency or private correctional facility in 67 this state. 68 3.âAny transfer in custody within the state, to the federal 69 government, or to another state, including which entity assumes 70 custody of the person. 71 (c)âAny change in the information required in paragraphs 72 (a) and (b) within 48 hours after such change. 73 (3)âThe board must publish all of the following information 74 in the database within 48 hours after receiving it from a law 75 enforcement agency or an entity contracting for private 76 correctional services in this state: 77 (a)âThe name and birthdate of the person. 78 (b)âThe date of arrest or detention, or the date when the 79 agency or entity first took custody of the person. 80 (c)âThe location of the arrest or detention. 81 (d)âIf the person is still in state custody, where the 82 person is housed. 83 (e)âIf the person is no longer in state custody, when the 84 person was released or transferred to another jurisdiction. 85 Section 3.âParagraph (h) of subsection (4) of section 86 908.1032, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 87 908.1032âState Immigration Enforcement Council.âThe State 88 Immigration Enforcement Council, an advisory council as defined 89 in s. 20.03, is created within the State Board of Immigration 90 Enforcement for the purpose of advising the board. 91 (4)âThe council shall: 92 (h)âUpon unanimous approval of the board, assist in the 93 collection of data from law enforcement agencies as required 94 under s. 908.1031(3)(f) s. 908.1031(3)(e). 95 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.